Nevada, session 83, AB357.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 432.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
432.120 1. Information contained in the Central Registry
must not be released unless the right of the applicant to the
information is confirmed, the information concerning the report of
abuse or neglect of the child or a violation of NRS 201.540,
201.553, 201.560, 392.4633 or 394.366 has been reported pursuant
to NRS 392.337 or 432B.310, as applicable, the released
information discloses the disposition of the case and, if the
information is being provided pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS
432.100, the person who is the subject of the background
investigation provides written authorization for the release of the
information.
2. The information contained in the Central Registry
concerning cases in which a report of abuse or neglect of a child has
been substantiated by an agency which provides child welfare
services must be deleted from the Central Registry not later than 10
years after the child who is the subject of the report reaches the age
of 18 years.
3. The Division shall not release information from the Central
Registry regarding a report of child abuse or neglect made pursuant
to NRS 392.303 or 432B.220 that received a disposition other than
substantiated to any person or entity except for an agency which
provides child welfare services.
4. If an applicant for the release of information from the
Central Registry is a public employer and the release of
information from the Central Registry is not otherwise prohibited
by this section, the Division shall release the information from the
Central Registry to the public employer within 72 hours after the
Division receives the application. The information from
the Central Registry must be sent by secure electronic
transmission to the electronic mail address of the public employer
or a designee of the public employer.
-
*AB357*

– 3 –
5. The Division shall adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Public employer” means the State of Nevada, an agency
of this State or a political subdivision of this State.
(b) “Secure electronic transmission” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 179.530.
Sec. 2. NRS 179A.103 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179A.103 1. There is hereby established within the Central
Repository a service to conduct a name-based search of records of
criminal history of an employee, prospective employee, volunteer or
prospective volunteer.
2. An eligible person that wishes to participate in the service
must enter into a contract with the Central Repository. The elements
of a contract entered into pursuant to this section must be limited to
requiring the eligible person to:
(a) Pay a fee pursuant to subsection 3, if applicable; and
(b) Comply with applicable law.
3. The Central Repository may charge a reasonable fee for
participation in the service.
4. An authorized participant of the service may inquire about
the records of criminal history of an employee, prospective
employee, volunteer or prospective volunteer to determine the
suitability of the employee or prospective employee for employment
or the suitability of the volunteer or prospective volunteer for
volunteering.
5. The Central Repository shall disseminate to an authorized
participant of the service information which reflects convictions
only.
6. An employee, prospective employee, volunteer or
prospective volunteer who is proposed to be the subject of a name-
based search must provide his or her written consent directly to the
authorized participant or, if the authorized participant is a screening
service, directly to the eligible person designating the screening
service to receive records of criminal history, for the Central
Repository to perform the search and to release the information to
an authorized participant. The written consent form may be:
(a) A form designated by the Central Repository; or
(b) If the authorized participant is a screening service, a form
that complies with the provisions of 15 U.S.C. § 1681b(b)2 for the
procurement of a consumer report.
7. If an authorized participant is a public employer, the
Central Repository shall release the results of any inquiry about
the records of criminal history made by the public employer within
72 hours after the public employer makes the inquiry. The results
-
*AB357*

– 4 –
of such an inquiry must be sent by secure electronic transmission
to the electronic mail address of the public employer or a designee
of the public employer.
8. A screening service that is designated to receive records of
criminal history on behalf of an eligible person may provide such
records of criminal history to the eligible person upon request of the
eligible person if the screening service maintains records of its
dissemination of the records of criminal history.
[8.] 9. The Central Repository may audit an authorized
participant, at such times as the Central Repository deems
necessary, to ensure that records of criminal history are securely
maintained.
[9.] 10. The Central Repository may terminate participation in
the service if an authorized participant fails:
(a) To pay the fees required to participate in the service; or
(b) To address, within a reasonable period, deficiencies
identified in an audit conducted pursuant to subsection 8.
[10.] 11. As used in this section:
(a) “Authorized participant” means an eligible person who has
entered into a contract with the Central Repository to participate in
the service established pursuant to subsection 1.
(b) “Consumer report” has the meaning ascribed to it in 15
U.S.C. § 1681a(d).
(c) “Eligible person” means:
(1) An employer.
(2) A volunteer organization.
(3) A screening service.
(d) “Employer” means a person that:
(1) Employs an employee or makes employment decisions;
(2) Enters into a contract with an independent contractor or
makes the determination whether to enter into a contract with an
independent contractor; or
(3) Enters into a contract with a person, business or
organization for the provision, directly or indirectly, of labor,
services or materials by an independent contractor, subcontractor or
a third party.
(e) “Employment” includes performing services, directly or
indirectly, for an employer as an independent contractor,
subcontractor or a third party pursuant to a contract.
(f) “Public employer” means the State of Nevada, an agency of
this State or a political subdivision of this State.
(g) “Screening service” means a person or entity designated,
directly or indirectly, by an eligible person to provide employment
or volunteer screening services to the eligible person.
-
*AB357*

– 5 –
[(g)] (h) “Secure electronic transmission” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 179.530.
(i) “Written consent” means:
(1) An electronic signature pursuant to 15 U.S.C. § 7006(5),
and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto;
(2) Completion of the form designated by the Central
Repository pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 6; or
(3) Consent by means of mail, the Internet, other electronic
means or other means pursuant to 15 U.S.C. § 1681b(b)(2), and any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
H
-
*AB357*